SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.aff
FLAG num
SFX 0580 Y 22
SFX 0580 eń enja ..
SFX 0580 eń enjach ..
SFX 0580 eń enjam ..
SFX 0580 eń enje ..
SFX 0580 eń enjej ..
SFX 0580 eń enjemi ..
SFX 0580 eń enjo ..
SFX 0580 eń enjom ..
SFX 0580 eń enjomaj ..
SFX 0580 eń enjow ..
SFX 0580 eń enju ..
SFX 0580 eń nja ..
SFX 0580 eń njach ..
SFX 0580 eń njam ..
SFX 0580 eń nje ..
SFX 0580 eń njej ..
SFX 0580 eń njemi ..
SFX 0580 eń njo ..
SFX 0580 eń njom ..
SFX 0580 eń njomaj ..
SFX 0580 eń njow ..
SFX 0580 eń nju ..

SFX 0581 Y 29
SFX 0581 ń njacy .
SFX 0581 ń nje .
SFX 0581 ń njemoj .
SFX 0581 ń njemy .
SFX 0581 ń njenje .
SFX 0581 ń njeny .
SFX 0581 ń njetaj .
SFX 0581 ń njetej .
SFX 0581 ń njeće .
SFX 0581 ń nješ .
SFX 0581 ń nu .
SFX 0581 ń ny .
SFX 0581 ń nych .
SFX 0581 ń nychmoj .
SFX 0581 ń nychmy .
SFX 0581 ń nychu .
SFX 0581 ń nyli .
SFX 0581 ń nyć .
SFX 0581 ń nył .
SFX 0581 ń nyła .
SFX 0581 ń nyło .
SFX 0581 ń nyłoj .
SFX 0581 ń nyštaj .
SFX 0581 ń nyštej .
SFX 0581 ń nyšće .
SFX 0581 ń nć .
SFX 0581 ń ńtaj .
SFX 0581 ń ńtej .
SFX 0581 ń ńće .

SFX 0582 Y 9
SFX 0582 ka ko ..
SFX 0582 ka kom ..
SFX 0582 ka ku ..
SFX 0582 ka čach ..
SFX 0582 ka čam ..
SFX 0582 ka čemi ..
SFX 0582 ka či ..
SFX 0582 ka čomaj ..
SFX 0582 ka čow ..

SFX 0583 Y 15
SFX 0583 ł le .
SFX 0583 ł ła .
SFX 0583 ł łach .
SFX 0583 ł łaj .
SFX 0583 ł łam .
SFX 0583 ł łami .
SFX 0583 ł łej .
SFX 0583 ł ło .
SFX 0583 ł łoch .
SFX 0583 ł łom .
SFX 0583 ł łomaj .
SFX 0583 ł łow .
SFX 0583 ł łu .
SFX 0583 ł ły .
SFX 0583 ł łymi .

SFX 0584 Y 30
SFX 0584 uj owach ..
SFX 0584 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0584 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0584 uj owachu ..
SFX 0584 uj owacy ..
SFX 0584 uj owali ..
SFX 0584 uj owanje ..
SFX 0584 uj owany ..
SFX 0584 uj ować ..
SFX 0584 uj ował ..
SFX 0584 uj owała ..
SFX 0584 uj owało ..
SFX 0584 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0584 uj owaše ..
SFX 0584 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0584 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0584 uj owašće ..
SFX 0584 uj uja ..
SFX 0584 uj uje ..
SFX 0584 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0584 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0584 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0584 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0584 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0584 uj uješ ..
SFX 0584 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0584 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0584 uj uju ..
SFX 0584 uj ujće ..
SFX 0584 uj zać ..

SFX 0585 Y 4
SFX 0585 ósom osmjo ....
SFX 0585 ósom osmjoch ....
SFX 0585 ósom osmjom ....
SFX 0585 ósom osmjomi ....

SFX 0586 Y 30
SFX 0586 ća etni ..
SFX 0586 ća etnimoj ..
SFX 0586 ća etnimy ..
SFX 0586 ća etnitaj ..
SFX 0586 ća etnitej ..
SFX 0586 ća etniće ..
SFX 0586 ća etnje ..
SFX 0586 ća etnjemoj ..
SFX 0586 ća etnjemy ..
SFX 0586 ća etnjetaj ..
SFX 0586 ća etnjetej ..
SFX 0586 ća etnjeće ..
SFX 0586 ća etnješ ..
SFX 0586 ća etnu ..
SFX 0586 ća ćach ..
SFX 0586 ća ćachmoj ..
SFX 0586 ća ćachmy ..
SFX 0586 ća ćachu ..
SFX 0586 ća ćaty ..
SFX 0586 ća ćał ..
SFX 0586 ća ćała ..
SFX 0586 ća ćałe ..
SFX 0586 ća ćało ..
SFX 0586 ća ćałoj ..
SFX 0586 ća ćeli ..
SFX 0586 ća ćeć ..
SFX 0586 ća ćeće ..
SFX 0586 ća ćeštaj ..
SFX 0586 ća ćeštej ..
SFX 0586 ća ćešće ..

SFX 0587 Y 26
SFX 0587 0 ch .
SFX 0587 0 chmoj .
SFX 0587 0 chmy .
SFX 0587 0 chu .
SFX 0587 0 cy .
SFX 0587 0 j .
SFX 0587 0 ja .
SFX 0587 0 jtaj .
SFX 0587 0 jtej .
SFX 0587 0 jće .
SFX 0587 0 li .
SFX 0587 0 moj .
SFX 0587 0 my .
SFX 0587 0 nje .
SFX 0587 0 taj .
SFX 0587 0 tej .
SFX 0587 0 ty .
SFX 0587 0 ć .
SFX 0587 0 će .
SFX 0587 0 ł .
SFX 0587 0 ła .
SFX 0587 0 ło .
SFX 0587 0 łoj .
SFX 0587 0 štaj .
SFX 0587 0 štej .
SFX 0587 0 šće .

SFX 0588 Y 40
SFX 0588 i imoj .
SFX 0588 i imy .
SFX 0588 i itaj .
SFX 0588 i itej .
SFX 0588 i iće .
SFX 0588 i ja .
SFX 0588 i je .
SFX 0588 i jemoj .
SFX 0588 i jemy .
SFX 0588 i jenje .
SFX 0588 i jeny .
SFX 0588 i jetaj .
SFX 0588 i jetej .
SFX 0588 i jeće .
SFX 0588 i ješ .
SFX 0588 i u .
SFX 0588 i ě .
SFX 0588 i ěch .
SFX 0588 i ěchmoj .
SFX 0588 i ěchmy .
SFX 0588 i ěchu .
SFX 0588 i ěj .
SFX 0588 i ěje .
SFX 0588 i ěješ .
SFX 0588 i ějmy .
SFX 0588 i ěju .
SFX 0588 i ějće .
SFX 0588 i ěli .
SFX 0588 i ěmoj .
SFX 0588 i ětaj .
SFX 0588 i ětej .
SFX 0588 i ěć .
SFX 0588 i ěł .
SFX 0588 i ěła .
SFX 0588 i ěłe .
SFX 0588 i ěło .
SFX 0588 i ěłoj .
SFX 0588 i ěštaj .
SFX 0588 i ěštej .
SFX 0588 i ěšće .

SFX 0589 Y 28
SFX 0589 0 am .
SFX 0589 0 aš .
SFX 0589 0 ch .
SFX 0589 0 chmoj .
SFX 0589 0 chmy .
SFX 0589 0 chu .
SFX 0589 0 cy .
SFX 0589 0 j .
SFX 0589 0 ja .
SFX 0589 0 jtaj .
SFX 0589 0 jtej .
SFX 0589 0 jće .
SFX 0589 0 li .
SFX 0589 0 moj .
SFX 0589 0 my .
SFX 0589 0 nje .
SFX 0589 0 ny .
SFX 0589 0 taj .
SFX 0589 0 tej .
SFX 0589 0 ć .
SFX 0589 0 će .
SFX 0589 0 ł .
SFX 0589 0 ła .
SFX 0589 0 ło .
SFX 0589 0 łoj .
SFX 0589 0 štaj .
SFX 0589 0 štej .
SFX 0589 0 šće .

SFX 0590 Y 14
SFX 0590 cy ka ..
SFX 0590 cy kaj ..
SFX 0590 cy ke ..
SFX 0590 cy keho ..
SFX 0590 cy kej ..
SFX 0590 cy keje ..
SFX 0590 cy keju ..
SFX 0590 cy kemu ..
SFX 0590 cy kich ..
SFX 0590 cy kim ..
SFX 0590 cy kimaj ..
SFX 0590 cy kimi ..
SFX 0590 cy ku ..
SFX 0590 cy kón ..

SFX 0591 Y 11
SFX 0591 a eho .
SFX 0591 a ej .
SFX 0591 a eje .
SFX 0591 a emu .
SFX 0591 a o .
SFX 0591 a u .
SFX 0591 a ón .
SFX 0591 a ě .
SFX 0591 a ěch .
SFX 0591 a ěm .
SFX 0591 a ěmi .

SFX 0592 Y 28
SFX 0592 a ach .
SFX 0592 a achmoj .
SFX 0592 a achmy .
SFX 0592 a achu .
SFX 0592 a acy .
SFX 0592 a amoj .
SFX 0592 a amy .
SFX 0592 a any .
SFX 0592 a ataj .
SFX 0592 a atej .
SFX 0592 a ał .
SFX 0592 a ała .
SFX 0592 a ało .
SFX 0592 a ałoj .
SFX 0592 a ej .
SFX 0592 a eja .
SFX 0592 a ejtaj .
SFX 0592 a ejtej .
SFX 0592 a ejće .
SFX 0592 a eli .
SFX 0592 a enje .
SFX 0592 a eć .
SFX 0592 a eće .
SFX 0592 a eštaj .
SFX 0592 a eštej .
SFX 0592 a ešće .
SFX 0592 a uješ .
SFX 0592 a uju .

SFX 0593 Y 9
SFX 0593 ši cha ..
SFX 0593 ši cho ..
SFX 0593 ši chom ..
SFX 0593 ši chu ..
SFX 0593 ši šach ..
SFX 0593 ši šam ..
SFX 0593 ši šemi ..
SFX 0593 ši šomaj ..
SFX 0593 ši šow ..

SFX 0594 Y 30
SFX 0594 0 a .
SFX 0594 0 ach .
SFX 0594 0 achmoj .
SFX 0594 0 achmy .
SFX 0594 0 achu .
SFX 0594 0 acy .
SFX 0594 0 any .
SFX 0594 0 ał .
SFX 0594 0 ała .
SFX 0594 0 ało .
SFX 0594 0 ałoj .
SFX 0594 0 eli .
SFX 0594 0 enje .
SFX 0594 0 eć .
SFX 0594 0 eštaj .
SFX 0594 0 eštej .
SFX 0594 0 ešće .
SFX 0594 0 i .
SFX 0594 0 iješ .
SFX 0594 0 iju .
SFX 0594 0 imoj .
SFX 0594 0 imy .
SFX 0594 0 itaj .
SFX 0594 0 itej .
SFX 0594 0 iće .
SFX 0594 0 moj .
SFX 0594 0 my .
SFX 0594 0 taj .
SFX 0594 0 tej .
SFX 0594 0 će .

SFX 0595 Y 30
SFX 0595 0 ch .
SFX 0595 0 chmoj .
SFX 0595 0 chmy .
SFX 0595 0 chu .
SFX 0595 0 eš .
SFX 0595 0 j .
SFX 0595 0 ja .
SFX 0595 0 jacy .
SFX 0595 0 je .
SFX 0595 0 jemoj .
SFX 0595 0 jemy .
SFX 0595 0 jetaj .
SFX 0595 0 jetej .
SFX 0595 0 jeće .
SFX 0595 0 jtaj .
SFX 0595 0 jtej .
SFX 0595 0 jće .
SFX 0595 0 li .
SFX 0595 0 ty .
SFX 0595 0 u .
SFX 0595 0 ć .
SFX 0595 0 će .
SFX 0595 0 ł .
SFX 0595 0 ła .
SFX 0595 0 łe .
SFX 0595 0 ło .
SFX 0595 0 łoj .
SFX 0595 0 štaj .
SFX 0595 0 štej .
SFX 0595 0 šće .

SFX 0596 Y 30
SFX 0596 uj owach ..
SFX 0596 uj owachmoj ..
SFX 0596 uj owachmy ..
SFX 0596 uj owachu ..
SFX 0596 uj owacy ..
SFX 0596 uj owali ..
SFX 0596 uj owanje ..
SFX 0596 uj owany ..
SFX 0596 uj ować ..
SFX 0596 uj ował ..
SFX 0596 uj owała ..
SFX 0596 uj owało ..
SFX 0596 uj owałoj ..
SFX 0596 uj owaše ..
SFX 0596 uj owaštaj ..
SFX 0596 uj owaštej ..
SFX 0596 uj owašće ..
SFX 0596 uj uja ..
SFX 0596 uj uje ..
SFX 0596 uj ujemoj ..
SFX 0596 uj ujemy ..
SFX 0596 uj ujetaj ..
SFX 0596 uj ujetej ..
SFX 0596 uj ujeće ..
SFX 0596 uj uješ ..
SFX 0596 uj ujtaj ..
SFX 0596 uj ujtej ..
SFX 0596 uj uju ..
SFX 0596 uj ujće ..
SFX 0596 uj zyć ..
