SpellChecking/Dictionaries/sorbian.dic
njewotewri/0588
njewotća/0586
woheń/0580
wohladń/0581
woka/0582
wopokazuj/0584
wotesta/0587
wotewri/0588
wotzběha/0589
wotća/0586
woł/0583
wubla/0592
wukl/0594
wupas/0595
wuražuj/0596
wuši/0593
wósom/0585
wša/0591
wšitcy/0590
